v1.1/old/guesser.lexc
Multichar_Symbols ngngw ngng ghhw ghh ghw ngw gg gh kw ll mm ng nn rr qw wh
                  [N] [V] [Sg] [Pl] [Du] [1Sg] [1Du] [1Pl] [2Sg] [2Du] [2Pl] [3Sg] [3Du] [3Pl] [4Sg] [4Pl] [4Du] [_] [N→N] [N→V] [V→N] [V→V] [Imprs_Agnt]
                  [Unpd] [1SgPoss] [2SgPoss] [3SgPoss] [4SgPoss] [1PlPoss] [2PlPoss] [3PlPoss] [4PlPoss] [1DuPoss] [2DuPoss] [3DuPoss] [4DuPoss] [SgPosd] [PlPosd] [DuPosd]
                  [Abs] [Abl_Mod] [Equ] [Loc] [Rel] [Ter] [Via] [Intr] [Trns] [Ind] [Intrg] [Opt] [PRS] [NEG] [FUT] [Ptcp] [Prec] [Conc] [CnsqI] [CnsqII] [Cond] [Ctmp] [Sbrd] [Ptcp_Obl] [Cmpd_Vbl] [Quant_Qual] [Encl]
                  [Opt_PRS_2Sg] [Opt_PRS_2Sg_3Sg] [Opt_FUT_Intr] [To_Feel_R_Toward]
                  @* @₁ @₂ ~sf ~f ~h -w –– (e) (g/t) (ng₁) (ng₂) (p/v) (t/y) (s/z) (g) (t) (te) (i₁) (i₂) (i/u) (u) (a) (s) (at)
                  (pete)fte @~–(g)ka @~–(g)ke
                  ~f-w/-w ~sf-w%:(e)tgun/teggun @₁–lghii/@*ngugh* @₁~fy/~f(ng₁) @₁~flu/na
                  @P.VALENCE.INTR@ @P.VALENCE.TRNS@ @R.VALENCE.INTR@ @R.VALENCE.TRNS@ @R.VALENCE@
				  [Guess] [DemGuess]  [PtclGuess] [ERootGuess] [NounGuess] [PosRootGuess] [QuantQualGuess] [VerbGuess] [ForeignWordGuess] [Foreign]



LEXICON Root
    Demonstrative   ;
    EmotionalRoot   ;
    NounBase        ;
    Particle        ;
    PosturalRoot    ;
    QuantQual       ;
    VerbBase        ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                       !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Particles               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                       !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Particle

[PtclGuess][Guess]:[PtclGuess] EncliticOrEnd;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                        !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Noun Bases               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                        !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NounBase

! [ForeignWordGuess][Foreign][Guess]:[ForeignWordGuess]  NounPostbase1;
[NounGuess][Guess]:[NounGuess]  NounPostbase1;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                                 !!!!!!
!!!!!!     Derivational Morphemes Applied To Nouns / Derived Bases     !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                                 !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                        !!!
!!!     NounPostbase 1     !!!
!!!                        !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
